Hawaii statutes.
§189-46 Reports. The department shall
make a report for the period ending December 31 of each year to the
governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of
representatives, on the progress made under this part. The report shall be submitted
not later than February 1 immediately following the period covered by the
report. [L 1975, c 167, §12; am L 1976, c 70, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next